Massachusetts, session 194th, H5227.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding section 59A of chapter 43 of the General Laws or any
other general or special law to the contrary, if a vacancy occurs, before the last 12 months of the
term, in the office of a councilor elected by and from the voters of a ward in Marlborough, the
Marlborough city council shall forthwith order an election to fill such vacancy for the remainder
of the unexpired term.; If a vacancy occurs, in the last 12 months of the term, in the office of a
councilor elected by and from the voters of a ward in Marlborough, such vacancy shall be filled
forthwith by a majority vote of all the remaining members of the Marlborough city council for
the remainder of the unexpired term.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1